Hawaii statutes.
§412:9-402 Membership in federal home loan
bank. Any depository financial services loan company may become a member
of a federal home loan bank organized under authority of the Federal Home Loan
Bank Act, or any successor or similar systems of federal home loan banks
established by Congress, and may purchase and hold the shares of such federal
home loan bank. The depository financial services loan company may have and
exercise all powers not in conflict with the laws of this State incident to
such membership; provided, however, that notwithstanding such membership the
depository financial services loan company and its directors, officers, and
shareholders shall continue to be subject to all liabilities and duties imposed
upon them by any law of this State. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next